Alabama, session 2026rs, HB297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The boundary lines and corporate limits of
the City of Monroeville in Monroe County are altered and
rearranged to include within the corporate limits of the
municipality, in addition to the lands now included, all of
the following territory:
State Highway No. 21 Description
BEGINNING AT THE INTERSECTION OF THE SOUTH LINE OF
SECTION 22 TOWNSHIP 6 NORTH, RANGE 7 EAST, MONROE COUNTY,
ALABAMA, WITH THE EAST AND WEST RIGHT OF WAY LINES OF ALABAMA
STATE HIGHWAY No. 21, BEING MORE OR LESS AT THE INTERSECTION
OF OAK GROVE ROAD WITH SAID STATE HIGHWAY, THENCE
NORTHEASTERLY ALONG SAID STATE HIGHWAY RIGHT OF WAY LINES 9800
FEET MORE OR LESS TO THE INTERSECTION OF SAID STATE HIGHWAY
RIGHT OF WAY LINES WITH THE NORTH LINE OF THE SOUTHEAST ¼ OF
THE SOUTHEAST ¼ OF SECTION 14 TOWNSHIP 6 NORTH, RANGE 7 EAST,
MONROE COUNTY ALABAMA, BEING MORE OR LESS AT THE INTERSECTION
OF TIGER DRIVE WITH SAID STATE HIGHWAY, INCLUDING ANY AND ALL
RIGHT OF WAY FLAIRS AND CHANGES ALONG SAID RIGHT OF WAY OF
ALABAMA STATE HIGHWAY No. 21 IN THE ABOVE DESCRIBED PORTION.
U.S. Highway No. 84 Description
BEGINNING AT THE INTERSECTION OF THE WEST LINE OF
SECTION 15 TOWNSHIP 6 NORTH, RANGE 7 EAST, MONROE COUNTY,
ALABAMA, WITH THE NORTH AND SOUTH RIGHT OF WAY LINES OF U.S.
Page 1

ALABAMA, WITH THE NORTH AND SOUTH RIGHT OF WAY LINES OF U.S.
HB297 Enrolled
HIGHWAY No. 84 BEING MORE OR LESS AT THE INTERSECTION OF
SUNRISE LANE AND SAID U.S. HIGHWAY, THENCE SOUTHEASTERLY ALONG
SAID NORTH AND SOUTH RIGHT OF WAY LINES 12500 FEET MORE OR
LESS TO THE INTERSECTION OF SAID NORTH AND SOUTH RIGHT OF WAY
LINES WITH THE EAST RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF GARDNER ROAD,
INCLUDING ANY AND ALL RIGHT OF WAY FLAIRS AND CHANGES ALONG
SAID RIGHT OF WAY OF ALABAMA U.S. HIGHWAY No. 84 IN THE ABOVE
DESCRIBED PORTION.
State Highway No. 136 Description
BEGINNING AT THE INTERSECTION OF THE NORTH RIGHT OF WAY
LINE OF U.S. HIGHWAY No. 84 WITH THE EAST AND WEST RIGHT OF
WAY LINES OF STATE HIGHWAY No. 136, IN THE SOUTH ½ OF THE
SOUTHWEST ¼ OF SECTION 23 TOWNSHIP 6 NORTH, RANGE 7 EAST,
MONROE COUNTY, ALABAMA, THENCE NORTH ALONG SAID EAST AND WEST
RIGHT OF WAY LINES 2900 FEET MORE OR LESS TO THE SOUTH RIGHT
OF WAY LINE OF STATE HIGHWAY No. 21, INCLUDING ANY AND ALL
RIGHT OF WAY FLAIRS AND CHANGES ALONG SAID RIGHT OF WAY OF
ALABAMA STATE HIGHWAY No. 21 IN THE ABOVE DESCRIBED PORTION.
Section 2. In accordance with Section 11-42-6 of the
Code of Alabama 1975, a map showing the proposed territory to
be altered, rearranged, and extended from the City of
Monroeville is on file and open to public inspection in the
office of the Judge of Probate in Monroe County, Alabama.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB297 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 26-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 25-Feb-26 Passed



Page 3